Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-1313. Limitation on benefit enhancement — Acts 1997, No. 953.

A benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-7-1306 shall not be implemented if it would cause the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed an eighteen-year amortization.

A benefit enhancement provided for by § 24-7-1306 shall not be implemented by the system until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than an eighteen-year amortization.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 953, § 2; 2019, No. 427, § 21.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-7-1301 — 24-7-1312 and 24-7-1314 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-7-101 — 24-7-206, 24-7-209 — 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-607, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-720, 24-7-723, 24-7-801, 24-7-803 — 24-7-901, 24-7-903 — 24-7-1312, and 24-7-1314 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote the section.

24-7-1314. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The repeal of this section by Acts 2019, No. 296, § 2 superseded the amendment of this section by Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2892. The amendment by Acts 2019, No. 315 deleted
“and regulations” following “rules” in subsection (a).

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning early participation, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 296, § 2, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1999, No. 1590, § 1; 2005, No. 188, § 4; 2017, No. 750, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2892. For current law, see § 24-7-1306.

24-7-1315. Duty of board of trustees.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall present to the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs information concerning the statutory authority and actuarial appropriateness of proposed board actions to establish or revise a multiplier, any benefit, or a provision of a deferred retirement option plan.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1590, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-7-1301 — 24-7-1312 and 24-7-1314 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

References to “this chapter” in §§ 24-7-101 — 24-7-206, 24-7-209 — 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-607, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-720, 24-7-723, 24-7-801, 24-7-803 — 24-7-901, 24-7-903 — 24-7-1312, and 24-7-1314 may not apply to this section which was enacted subsequently.

24-7-1316. Funding objectives of Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan — Cost neutrality.

As part of its obligation to ensure that the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is cost neutral to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is authorized to make further adjustments to the plan to make it cost neutral to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 298, § 7.

Subchapter 14
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Affordable Housing Investment Act

24-7-1401 — 24-7-1409. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 468, § 27. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-7-1401. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 1.

24-7-1402. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 2.

24-7-1403. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 3.

24-7-1404. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 4.

24-7-1405. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 5.

24-7-1406. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 6.

24-7-1407. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 7.

24-7-1408. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 8.

24-7-1409. Acts 1999, No. 555, § 9.

Subchapter 15
— Retirants' Ad Hoc Increase Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-7-1501. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Retirants' Ad Hoc Increase Act”.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1315, § 1.

24-7-1502. Benefit generally.

The annual benefit payable to eligible retirees, survivors, and beneficiaries of retirants of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall be subject to a one-time ad hoc increase based on the retirant's years of credited service that is grouped within descending decades as calculated by subtracting the total years of credited service from the date of retirement.

A break in credited service is not considered under this subchapter.

Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan participants shall have the total years of credited service subtracted from the date of entry into the plan.

One-half (½) of the annual dollar increase per year of credited service shall be calculated and provided to all retirees, survivors, and beneficiaries of retirants that are eligible to receive this increase.

One-half (½) of the annual dollar increase per year of credited service shall be calculated then prorated based on the amount of contributory service credit to total service on the retirant's:

Retirement date; or

Plan entry date.

The amounts under this subsection shall be calculated and provided to all retirees, survivors, and beneficiaries of retirants.

The ad hoc benefit is payable to the retirees, survivors, and beneficiaries of retirants of the system beginning on a July 1 that is at least twelve (12) full months after the effective date of a monthly benefit.

The ad hoc benefit for a retirant, survivor, and beneficiary of a retirant shall not increase the retirant's current benefit by more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the annuity benefit payable as of the prior June 30.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1315, § 1.

24-7-1503. Ad hoc benefit formula.

The schedule of decade dollar amounts per year of credited service is:

Formula Decades in
Which Credited Service Was Accrued Service
Annual $ Increase Per Year of Credited Service
2000 – and later $5 1990–1999 $10 1980–1989 $20 1970–1979 $30 1960–1969 $40 1950–1959 $50 1940–1949 $60 1930–1939 $70 1920–1929 $80 1910–1919 $90

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1315, § 1.

24-7-1504. Promulgation of rules — Duty of board.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall promulgate rules for the ad hoc benefit under this subchapter.

An ad hoc benefit under this subchapter shall not be implemented if the ad hoc benefit would cause the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed an eighteen-year amortization.

The board shall only authorize an ad hoc benefit that is actuarially appropriate for the system.

Before an increase of retirement benefit through an ad hoc benefit is authorized, the board shall file relevant information with the Joint Interim Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs regarding the actuarial appropriateness of the increase.

The board may reduce the decade increase formula under § 24-7-1503 proportionately on a one-to-one formula basis for each decade when the reduction is actuarially feasible to implement.

The ad hoc benefit increase is a one-time adjustment and shall also be used to increase the base amount of a retirant's benefits when calculating any future additional benefit increases.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1315, § 1; 2019, No. 427, § 22.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “an eighteen-year amortization” for “a thirty-year amortization” in (b).

Subchapter 16
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — Optional Participation by Employees of Institutions of Higher Education

Effective Dates.

Acts 2011, No. 513 § 2: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the establishment of the Post- Secondary Education Plan is part of a history of retirement legislation that seeks to develop a more equitable retirement system for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that confusion exists concerning the coverage of employees of state colleges, vocational-technical schools and particularly-named institutions; that there is uncertainty in the administration of this provision of the law; that legislative clarification is desperately needed; that certain provisions of Title 24 regarding retirement and pensions are in urgent need of revision; that such revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that this act is needed to protect the retirement benefits of employees of the public school system, to provide fair treatment and clear intent with respect to part-time employees of post-secondary or higher education employers, and to clarify the obligations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System with respect to its members who become employed by a post-secondary or higher education employer; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

Acts 2013, No. 607, § 2: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some employees of post-secondary institutions of higher education were denied membership in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System because of the requirement that they be a vested member of the system at the time of employment; that options for retirement and retirement planning should be available for employees who continue to serve the state through the educational system; that certain colleges who participate in the system want to offer new employees additional retirement options; and that this act is necessary to ensure the educational professional who was hired between July 1, 2011 and June 30, 2013 and remains employed by a PSHE employer is not prohibited from becoming a member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-7-1601. Legislative history — Findings — Intent.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

The establishment of the Post-Secondary Education Plan is a historical component of retirement legislation that seeks to develop a more equitable retirement system for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

Confusion about the intent of the General Assembly concerning the coverage of employees of state-supported universities, colleges, junior colleges, and vocational-technical schools, the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the Division of Career and Technical Education, the Adult Education Section, the Office of Skills Development, and Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, and any other entity offering both the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System retirement plan and an alternate retirement plan create uncertainty in the administration of law, and legislative clarification of the law is needed.

Historically, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System has been mandated by the General Assembly to provide retirement benefits for an employee of a public school, public educational agency, or any other eligible employer included for coverage in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Originally, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System was designed to provide retirement benefits to certified teachers and administrators in the public schools. However, the coverage has gradually been extended to all employees of the public schools and to other public entities that support educational activities in Arkansas.

Beginning with legislation in 1967 and continuing through the early 1980s, the General Assembly created a right for certain colleges, vocational-technical schools, and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board to establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan for its employees and perform all the functions reasonably appropriate in the retirement plan's administration.

The general intent of the early legislation was to allow those institutions of higher education employers to offer their employees the option to participate in an alternative retirement plan, the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System retirement plan, or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System retirement plan.

The law was designed to encourage recruitment of public school teachers and administrators into postsecondary positions by allowing them to continue in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to encourage recruitment of private and out-of-state educators by the use of the alternate retirement plan that is offered nationwide.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System requested an Attorney General's opinion for legal clarification, as the laws have been amended over time making the wording difficult to interpret.

All public school employees are mandatory members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as a condition of employment. The uncertainty is with employees of institutions of higher education employers, specifically:

Whether an institution of higher education employer can exclude a part-time employee from participation in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and thereby be exempt from reporting salary and remitting member or employer contributions for its part-time employees; and

Whether a retired Arkansas Teacher Retirement System member can be enrolled in the institution of higher education employer's alternate retirement plan with or without separation while simultaneously drawing retirement benefits from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The Attorney General's Opinion No. 2009-164, dated March 16, 2010, concludes that the current laws related to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System are difficult to understand, as the intent of the General Assembly is not clear, and legislative clarification is required.

Therefore, the General Assembly finds that this subchapter is necessary to:

Protect the retirement benefits for employees of the public school system;

Provide fair treatment and clear intent with respect to part-time employees and full-time employees of institutions of higher education employers;

Clarify the obligations of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System with respect to its members who become employed by an institution of higher education employer; and

Set forth requirements that supersede any prior legislation relating to employees of institutions of higher education.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2379.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Career and Technical Education, Adult Education Section, Office of Skills Development, and Arkansas Rehabilitation Services” for “Arkansas Department of Career Education” in (a)(2).

24-7-1602. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Alternative retirement plan” means an optional retirement plan based on the purchase of contracts providing retirement and death benefits for a benefits-eligible employee of a post-secondary or higher education employer;

“Benefits-eligible” means a class of employees, determined at the discretion of a post-secondary or higher education employer, eligible to participate in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, an alternate plan, or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System;

“Nonmandatory employer” means any public employer that was authorized to enroll new employees into the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or alternate retirement plan before July 1, 2011;

“PSHE employer” means a post-secondary or higher education employer:

With employees that may be hired without becoming mandatory members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and

That offers the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as a retirement plan on or after July 1, 2011; and

“PSHE plan” means the plan establishing the right of a new employee of a PSHE employer to participate in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System on or after July 1, 2011.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1.

24-7-1603. Provisions of subchapter controlling.

This subchapter controls any inconsistent provision of any other law regarding the enrollment and coverage of an employee of a PSHE employer in either the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System retirement plan or an alternative retirement plan that is offered by a PSHE employer.

This subchapter is enacted to supersede and specifically control any inconsistent provisions under § 24-7-801 et seq., § 24-7-901 et seq., and § 24-7-1001 et seq.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System retirement plan is administered under the provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, referred to in this section, was enacted by Acts 1973, No. 427, codified as §§ 24-7-201 — 24-7-205, 24-7-301 — 24-7-305, 24-7-401 — 24-7-411, 24-7-501, 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-604, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715,
and 24-7-716.

24-7-1604. Coverage for employees enrolled in Arkansas Teacher Retirement System before July 1, 2011.

Beginning July 1, 2011, all current employees of a nonmandatory employer that are current members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may continue membership and continue to accrue service credit in the system without any change in participation in the system if:

The employee is:

Part-time and the employee continues to provide services in each fiscal year at approximately the same level of service; or

Full-time and the employee continues to provide services in each fiscal year;

The nonmandatory employer chooses to continue reporting service to the system for the employee;

The nonmandatory employer determines that the employee will contribute at least part-time services in subsequent months of the fiscal year if services are not rendered throughout the fiscal year;

The nonmandatory employer remits contributions to the system on behalf of the employee during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2011, and each fiscal year thereafter; and

The employee's service with the nonmandatory employer is not terminated.

The nonmandatory employer shall remit employer contributions under § 24-7-401 et seq. for an employee under this section and shall be subject to the rights and obligations of an employer under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act.

The employee under this section shall remit employee contributions under § 24-7-406 et seq. and shall be subject to the rights and obligations of an employee under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act.

The nonmandatory employer shall provide information in a format requested by the system to allow the system to monitor and track all employees who participate in the system.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, referred to in this section, is codified throughout Title 24, Chapter 7.
See Publisher’s Note to § 24-7-1603.

24-7-1605. Optional participation by institution of higher education employers on or after July 1, 2011.

A PSHE employer shall adopt and record a policy or designation that identifies which positions at the PSHE employer's institution of higher education are benefits-eligible for retirement benefits.

A new employee of a PSHE employer may participate in the PSHE plan if the employee:

Is benefits-eligible as determined by the PSHE employer;

Is a vested member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System at the time of initial employment;

Is not a vested member of the system but meets the requirements of a less restrictive PSHE plan adopted by the specific PSHE employer; and

Signs an irrevocable PSHE plan participation form provided by the system.

A nonmandatory employer becomes a PSHE employer upon enrolling a new eligible member with the system on or after July 1, 2011.

A PSHE plan employee shall continue as a member in the system retirement plan so long as the member is employed by a PSHE employer.

An election to participate in the retirement system plan under this subsection is irrevocable so long as the employee does not obtain a termination refund from the system after the election.

A PSHE employer may adopt a resolution that allows a new employee to participate as a PSHE plan employee without being vested in the system.

A less restrictive plan is effective when the resolution adopted by a PSHE employer is presented to the system.

A PSHE employer may modify a less restrictive PSHE plan at any time.

A less restrictive plan adopted by a PSHE employer before July 1, 2013, may provide that a new employee hired between July 1, 2011, and June 30, 2013, who was prohibited from participating as a PSHE employee in the system and who would have been eligible under the less restrictive plan adopted by the PSHE plan employer may have an opt-in opportunity to participate in the system.

A PSHE employer may adopt an opt-in opportunity as provided under subdivision (c)(1)(B)(iii) of this section by resolution adopted by the governing body of the PSHE employer that allows a benefits-eligible employee who was prohibited from becoming a member of the system from July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2013, because the benefits-eligible employee was not a vested member of the system at the time of initial employment.

To participate in the opt-in opportunity provided by a PSHE employer, an employee shall:

Have been continuously employed by the PSHE employer once hired after July 1, 2011;

Meet the PSHE employer's less restrictive PSHE plan; and

Elect to become a member of the system between July 1, 2013, and June 30, 2014.

A benefits-eligible employee who elects to become a member of the system as provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this section may purchase service credit based on the applicable member employee and employer contribution rates on annual salary plus eight percent (8%) annual interest if the election is made between July 1, 2013, and June 30, 2014.

A purchase of service credit under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section shall be paid in full within one (1) year of the date that the benefits-eligible member elects to become a member of the system.

If a PSHE employer does not adopt a less restrictive plan, the PSHE plan shall remain in effect as provided under subsection (a) of this section.

If a benefits-eligible employee at a PSHE employer was prohibited from becoming a member of the system from July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2013, because the benefits-eligible employee was not a vested member of the system at the time of employment, and the benefits-eligible employee has been continuously employed by the PSHE employer, then the benefits-eligible employee may elect to become a member of the system between July 1, 2013, to June 30, 2014.

A benefits-eligible employee who elects to become a member of the system under subdivision (c)(1) of this section may purchase service credit based on the applicable member and employer contributions rates on annual salary plus eight percent (8%) annual interest using a special formula if the election is made between July 1, 2013, and June 30, 2014, and is paid in full within one (1) year of the date the benefits-eligible member elects to become a member of the system.

The PSHE employer shall remit employer contributions under § 24-7-401 et seq. and be subject to the rights and obligations of an employer under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act once a benefits-eligible employee elects to participate in the system.

The benefits-eligible employee who elects to participate in the system retirement plan shall remit employee contributions under § 24-7-406 and be subject to the rights and obligations of an employee under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act.

The PSHE employer shall comply with the system's verification and reporting requirements that are implemented by the system.

A member shall not purchase prior unreported service except as provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this section on or after July 1, 2011, regardless of when service was provided to a nonmandatory employer.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1; 2013, No. 607, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, referred to in this section, is codified throughout Title 24, Chapter 7.
See Publisher’s Note to § 24-7-1603.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted (a)(2)(C) and redesignated
former (a)(2)(C) as present (a)(2)(D); inserted present (c) and (d) and redesignated
the remaining subdivisions accordingly; substituted “are implemented” for “may be implemented” in present (f); and inserted “except as
provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this section” in present (g).

24-7-1606. Concurrent participation and certain salary credit prohibited.

A benefits-eligible employee shall not participate in an alternate retirement plan and continue to accrue service credit with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If a benefits-eligible employee is first employed by a nonmandatory employer or PSHE employer after July 1, 2011, and is concurrently employed by another retirement system employer, all separate days of service shall count for service credit, but only the highest salary of the concurrent retirement system employer shall count to determine final average salary.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1.

24-7-1607. Duties and responsibilities of board.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may promulgate rules necessary to carry out this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 513, § 1.